Georgia statutes. TITLE 23 Equity
Article 1 General Provisions

23-4-1.
Consolidation of actions.

Where there is one common claim to be asserted by or against several, and one is asserting the claim against many, or many against one, the court may utilize equitable powers to consolidate and determine the whole matter in one action.

History.

Civil Code 1895, § 4846; Civil Code 1910, § 5419; Code 1933, § 37-1007.

Law reviews.

For article comparing sections of the Georgia Civil Practice Act with preexisting provisions of the Georgia Code, see 3 Ga. St. B.J. 295 (1967).

23-4-2.
How extraordinary remedies claimed.

A claim for extraordinary relief or remedy to aid an action or defense may be asserted either by original pleading or by amendment.

History.

Ga. L. 1887, p. 64, § 4; Civil Code 1895, § 4839; Civil Code 1910, § 5412; Code 1933, § 37-907.

23-4-3.
Claim of legal and equitable relief by defendant.

A defendant to any action in the superior court or in the Georgia State-wide Business Court, whether the action is for legal or equitable relief, may claim legal or equitable relief, or both, by framing proper pleadings for that purpose and sustaining them by sufficient evidence.

History.

Ga. L. 1884-85, p. 36, § 2; Civil Code 1895, § 4837; Civil Code 1910, § 5410; Code 1933, § 37-905; Ga. L. 2019, p. 845, § 3-5/HB 239.

The 2019 amendment,

effective May 7, 2019, inserted “or in the Georgia State-wide Business Court” in the middle of this Code section.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2019 amendment of this Code section, see 36 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (2019).

23-4-4.
Proceedings ex parte or in execution of protective powers; petition.

All ex parte proceedings or proceedings for the execution of the protective powers of equity over trust estates or the estates of wards of equity shall be initiated by presenting a petition to the court. The court may order such other proceedings as the necessity of each case demands.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 4130; Code 1868, § 4162; Code 1873, § 4221; Code 1882, § 4221; Civil Code 1895, § 4863; Civil Code 1910, § 5436; Code 1933, § 37-1301.

23-4-5.
Receipt of and action on petition; transmittal of proceedings to clerk.

The judge may receive and act upon the petitions described in Code Section 23-4-4 at chambers, always transmitting the entire proceedings to the clerk to be entered on the minutes or other records of the court.

History.

Ga. L. 1853-54, p. 59, § 1; Code 1863, § 4131; Code 1868, § 4163; Code 1873, § 4222; Code 1882, § 4222; Civil Code 1895, § 4864; Civil Code 1910, § 5437; Code 1933, § 37-1302.